District of Columbia statutes.
6-641.05

Zoning regulations — Proposed regulations or amendments; public hearing; notice; National Capital Planning Commission.

(a)

(1)

No zoning regulation or map, or any amendment thereto, may be adopted by the Zoning Commission until the Zoning Commission:

(A)

Has held a public hearing, after notice, on such proposed regulation, map, or amendment; and

(B)

After such public hearing, submitted such proposed regulation, map, or amendment to the National Capital Planning Commission for comment and review.

(2)

If the National Capital Planning Commission fails to submit its comments regarding any such regulation, map, or amendment within 30 days after submission of such regulation, map, or amendment to it, then the Zoning Commission may proceed to act upon the proposed regulation, map, or amendment without further comment from the National Capital Planning Commission.

(b)

The notice required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this section shall be published at least 30 days prior to such public hearing and shall include a statement as to the time and place of the hearing and a summary of all changes in existing zoning regulations which would be made by adoption of the proposed regulation, map, or amendment. The Zoning Commission shall give such additional notice as it deems expedient and practicable. All interested persons shall be given a reasonable opportunity to be heard at such public hearing. If the hearing is adjourned from time to time, the time and place of reconvening shall be publicly announced prior to adjournment.

(c)

The Zoning Commission shall deposit with the National Capital Planning Commission all zoning regulations, maps, or amendments thereto, adopted by it.

June 20, 1938, 52 Stat. 798, ch. 534, § 5
Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 810, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 492(b)(2)
“National Capital Planning Commission” was substituted for “National Capital Park and Planning Commission” throughout this section in view of the Act of June 6, 1924, ch. 270, § 9, as added by the Act of July 19, 1952, 66 Stat. 790, ch. 949, § 1, which transferred the functions, powers, and duties of the National Capital Park and Planning Commission to the National Capital Planning Commission.
1973 Ed., § 5-417.
1981 Ed., § 5-417.
This section is referenced in § 2-1006.
National Capital Planning Commission, zoning and subdivision functions, see § 2-1006.